North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 28. North Carolina-Israel Visiting Scholar Program.

§ 116-230.
North Carolina-Israel Visiting Scholar Program.

There is created the North Carolina-Israel Visiting Scholar Program for the purpose of granting funds to members of the faculties of the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and institutions of higher education in Israel to assist in their travel and living expenses while participating in the program.

The President of The University of North Carolina shall appoint a North Carolina Committee to work with a committee from Israel to prepare proper guidelines for the administration of the program and to establish criteria for the designation of participating scholars.

Funds for the support of this program shall come from private sources, and grants shall be made for as many suitable recipients as can be found within budget limitations.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 81(c).